Mississippi, session 2026, HB4067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The provisions of this section shall apply to every section of this act that relates to the issuance of bonds unless otherwise provided in this act. (2)  As used in this act, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "State" means the State of Mississippi. (b)  "Commission" means the State Bond Commission. (3)  The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this act shall be payable in the manner provided in this subsection.  Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the commission. (4)  The bonds authorized by this act shall be signed by the chairman of the commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the commission.  The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.  However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi. (5)  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this act have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this act, the commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. (6)  The commission shall act as issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this act, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this act from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.  The commission may sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually. If such bonds are sold by sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, selected by the commission. The commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this act, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. (7)  The bonds issued under the provisions of this act are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged.  If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.  All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this subsection. (8)  Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of this act, the commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the special fund created in subsection (1) of the applicable section of this act.  The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed from the special fund under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. (9)  The bonds authorized under this act may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this act.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this act shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the commission by a majority of its members. (10)  The bonds authorized under the authority of this act may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Title 31, Chapter 13, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (11)  Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this act or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this act, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this act to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon. (12)  All bonds issued under the provisions of this act shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. (13)  Bonds issued under the provisions of this act and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. (14)  The proceeds of the bonds issued under this act shall be used solely for the purposes herein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. (15)  The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under this act; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof.  As used in this section, the "accreted value" of any bond means, as of any date of computation, an amount equal to the sum of (a) the stated initial value of such bond, plus (b) the interest accrued thereon from the issue date to the date of computation at the rate, compounded semiannually, that is necessary to produce the approximate yield to maturity shown for bonds of the same maturity. (16)  This act shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers granted in this act that relate to the issuance of bonds, but this act shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state that relates to the issuance of bonds. SECTION 2.  (1)  (a) (i)  A special fund, to be designated as the "2026 IHL Capital Improvements Fund", is created within the State Treasury.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. (ii)  Monies deposited into the fund shall be disbursed, in the discretion of the Department of Finance and Administration,  with the approval of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning on those projects related to the universities under its management and control to pay the costs of capital improvements, renovation and/or repair of existing facilities, furnishings and/or equipping facilities for public facilities as hereinafter described: NAME              PROJECT                             ALLOCATED Alcorn State University..............................$1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Alcorn State University/Division of Agriculture........................................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Delta State University..............................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Jackson State University............................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Mississippi State University........................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Mississippi State University/Division of Agriculture, Forestry and Veterinary Medicine......$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Mississippi University for Women....................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Mississippi Valley State University.................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 University of Mississippi...........................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 University of Mississippi Medical Center............$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 University of Southern Mississippi..................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 University of Southern Mississippi/Gulf Coast Campuses......................................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities at the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory, the Gulf Park Campus, and the John C. Stennis Space Center...................$ 1,000,000.00 IHL Education and Research Center..................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 TOTAL...............................................$13,000,000.00 (b) (i)  Amounts deposited into such special fund shall be disbursed to pay the costs of projects described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.  If any monies in such special fund are not used within four (4) years after the date the proceeds of the bonds authorized under this section are deposited into the special fund, then the institution of higher learning for which any unused monies are allocated under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall provide an accounting of such unused monies to the commission.  Promptly after the commission has certified, by resolution duly adopted, that the projects described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall have been completed, abandoned, or cannot be completed in a timely fashion, any amounts remaining in such special fund shall be applied to pay debt service on the bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds and as directed by the commission. (ii)  Monies in the special fund may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, in administering or providing assistance directly related to a project described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.  An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained for each project by the Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management.  Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs for a project shall not exceed two percent (2%) of the proceeds of bonds issued for such project.  Monies authorized for a particular project may not be used to reimburse administrative costs for unrelated projects. (c)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, is expressly authorized and empowered to receive and expend any local or other source funds in connection with the expenditure of funds provided for in this subsection.  The expenditure of monies deposited into the special fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Finance and Administration, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by such department, which warrants shall be issued upon requisitions signed by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his designee. (d)  Any amounts allocated to an institution of higher learning that are in excess of that needed to complete the projects at such institution of higher learning that are described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be used for general repairs and renovations at the institution of higher learning.  In addition, any amounts allocated to an institution of higher learning for the projects at such institution of higher learning that are described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be reduced by the amount of any other funds authorized by the Legislature during the 2026 Regular Session specifically for such purposes. (2)  (a)  The commission, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for all costs incurred or to be incurred for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Department of Finance and Administration, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this section, the department shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission is authorized to proceed under the provisions of Section 1(6) of this act.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed Thirteen Million Dollars ($13,000,000.00); however, the total amount of bonds that may be issued under this section shall be reduced by the amount of any other funds authorized by the Legislature during the 2026 Regular Session specifically for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.  No bonds shall be issued under this section after July 1, 2030. (b)  Any investment earnings on amounts deposited into the special fund created in subsection (1) of this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The provisions of Section 1 of this act shall apply to the issuance of bonds authorized under this section. SECTION 3.  (1)  (a) (i)  A special fund, to be designated as the "2026 Community and Junior Colleges Capital Improvements Fund", is created within the State Treasury.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund.  Monies in the fund may not be used or expended for any purpose except as authorized under this section. (ii)  Monies deposited into the fund shall be disbursed, in the discretion of the Department of Finance and Administration, to pay the costs of acquisition of real property, construction of new facilities, equipping and furnishing facilities, including furniture and technology equipment and infrastructure, and addition to or renovation of existing facilities for community and junior college campuses as recommended by the Mississippi Community College Board.  The amount to be expended at each community and junior college is as follows: Coahoma..................................... $ 1,000,000.00 Copiah-Lincoln.............................. 1,000,000.00 East Central................................ 1,000,000.00 East Mississippi............................ 1,000,000.00 Hinds....................................... 1,000,000.00 Holmes...................................... 1,000,000.00 Itawamba.................................... 1,000,000.00 Jones....................................... 1,000,000.00 Meridian.................................... 1,000,000.00 Mississippi Delta...........................    1,000,000.00 Mississippi Gulf Coast......................    1,000,000.00 Northeast Mississippi.......................    1,000,000.00 Northwest Mississippi.......................    1,000,000.00 Pearl River................................. 1,000,000.00 Southwest Mississippi.......................    1,000,000.00 GRAND TOTAL...................................... $15,000,000.00 (b)  Amounts deposited into such special fund shall be disbursed to pay the costs of projects described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.  If any monies in such special fund are not used within four (4) years after the date the proceeds of the bonds authorized under this section are deposited into the special fund, then the community college or junior college for which any such monies are allocated under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall provide an accounting of such unused monies to the commission.  Promptly after the commission has certified, by resolution duly adopted, that the projects described in paragraph (a) of this section shall have been completed, abandoned, or cannot be completed in a timely fashion, any amounts remaining in such special fund shall be applied to pay debt service on the bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds and as directed by the commission. (c)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, is expressly authorized and empowered to receive and expend any local or other source funds in connection with the expenditure of funds provided for in this section.  The expenditure of monies deposited into the special fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Finance and Administration, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by such department, which warrants shall be issued upon requisitions signed by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his designee. (2)  (a)  The commission, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for all costs incurred or to be incurred for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Department of Finance and Administration, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this section, the department shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission is authorized to proceed under the provisions of Section 1(6) of this act.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00); however, the total amount of bonds that may be issued under this section shall be reduced by the amount of any other funds authorized by the Legislature during the 2026 Regular Session specifically for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.  No bonds shall be issued under this section after July 1, 2030. (b)  Any investment earnings on amounts deposited into the special fund created in subsection (1) of this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The provisions of Section 1 of this act shall apply to the issuance of bonds authorized under this section. SECTION 4.  (1)  (a) (i)  A special fund, to be designated as the "2026 State Agencies Capital Improvements Fund", is created within the State Treasury.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund to pay the costs of capital improvements, renovation and/or repair of existing facilities, furnishings and/or equipping facilities for public facilities as hereinafter described: STATE AGENCIES......................................$ 8,500,000.00 Department of Corrections...........................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of department buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Department of Finance and Administration............$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of buildings and facilities under the care and control of the department..............$ 1,000,000.00 Department of Mental Health.........................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of buildings and facilities under the care and control of the department..............$ 1,000,000.00 Department of Public Safety.........................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of department buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Mississippi Fairgrounds.............................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of buildings and facilities.....................$ 1,000,000.00 Mississippi Veterans Affairs........................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of department buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Mississippi Schools for the Deaf and the Blind......$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science......$   500,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of campus buildings and facilities.................$    500,000.00 Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries, and Parks...........................$ 1,000,000.00 Repair, renovation, and upgrading of department buildings and facilities.................$ 1,000,000.00 TOTAL...............................................$ 8,500,000.00 (b)  (i)  Amounts deposited into such special fund shall be disbursed to pay the costs of projects described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.  If any monies in such special fund are not used within four (4) years after the date the proceeds of the bonds authorized under this section are deposited into the special fund, then the agency for which any unused monies are allocated under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall provide an accounting of such unused monies to the commission.  Promptly after the commission has certified, by resolution duly adopted, that the projects described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall have been completed, abandoned, or cannot be completed in a timely fashion, any amounts remaining in such special fund shall be applied to pay debt service on the bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds and as directed by the commission. (ii)  Monies in the special fund may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, in administering or providing assistance directly related to a project described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.  An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained for each project by the Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management.  Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs for a project shall not exceed two percent (2%) of the proceeds of bonds issued for such project.  Monies authorized for a particular project may not be used to reimburse administrative costs for unrelated projects. (c)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, is expressly authorized and empowered to receive and expend any local or other source funds in connection with the expenditure of funds provided for in this subsection.  The expenditure of monies deposited into the special fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Finance and Administration, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by such department, which warrants shall be issued upon requisitions signed by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his designee. (d)  Any amounts allocated to an agency that are in excess of that needed to complete the projects at such agency that are described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be used for general repairs and renovations at the agency.  In addition, any amounts allocated to an agency for the projects at such agency that are described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be reduced by the amount of any other funds authorized by the Legislature during the 2026 Regular Session specifically for such purposes. (2)  (a)  The commission, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for all costs incurred or to be incurred for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Department of Finance and Administration, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this section, the department shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission is authorized to proceed under the provisions of Section 1(6) of this act.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed Eight Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($8,500,000.00); however, the total amount of bonds that may be issued under this section shall be reduced by the amount of any other funds authorized by the Legislature during the 2026 Regular Session specifically for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.  No bonds shall be issued under this section after July 1, 2030. (b)  Any investment earnings on amounts deposited into the special fund created in subsection (1) of this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The provisions of Section 1 of this act shall apply to the issuance of bonds authorized under this section. SECTION 5.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Accreted value" of any bonds means, as of any date of computation, an amount equal to the sum of (i) the stated initial value of such bond, plus (ii) the interest accrued thereon from the issue date to the date of computation at the rate, compounded semiannually, that is necessary to produce the approximate yield to maturity shown for bonds of the same maturity. (b)  "State" means the State of Mississippi. (c)  "Commission" means the State Bond Commission. (2)  (a)  The Mississippi Development Authority, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for the program authorized in Section 57-1-18.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Mississippi Development Authority declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this subsection, the Mississippi Development Authority shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).  No bonds authorized under this section shall be issued after July 1, 2030. (b)  The proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Small Municipalities and Limited Population Counties Fund created pursuant to Section 57-1-18.  Any investment earnings on bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this section shall be payable in the manner provided in this subsection.  Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the commission. (4)  The bonds authorized by this section shall be signed by the chairman of the commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the commission.  The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.  However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi. (5)  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this section have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this section, the commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. (6)  The commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this section, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this section from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.  The commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually. If the bonds are to be sold on sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi,  selected by the commission. The commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. (7)  The bonds issued under the provisions of this section are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged.  If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.  All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this subsection. (8)  Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of this section, the commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the Small Municipalities and Limited Population Counties Fund created in Section 57-1-18. The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the Mississippi Development Authority under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. (9)  The bonds authorized under this section may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this section.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the commission by a majority of its members. (10)  The bonds authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (11)  Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this section or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this section, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this section to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon. (12)  All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. (13)  Bonds issued under the provisions of this section and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. (14)  The proceeds of the bonds issued under this section shall be used solely for the purposes therein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. (15)  The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under this section; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof. (16)  This section shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers therein granted, but this section shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state. SECTION 6.  Section 57-1-18, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-1-18.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Limited population county" means a county in the State of Mississippi with a population of thirty thousand (30,000) or less according to the most recent federal decennial census at the time the county submits its application to the MDA under this section. (b)  "MDA" means the Mississippi Development Authority. (c)  "Project" means highways, streets and other roadways, bridges, sidewalks, utilities, airfields, airports, acquisition of equipment, acquisition of real property, development of real property, improvements to real property, and any other project approved by the MDA. (d)  "Small municipality" means a municipality in the State of Mississippi with a population of ten thousand (10,000) or less according to the most recent federal decennial census at the time the municipality submits its application to the MDA under this section.  The term "small municipality" also includes a municipal historical hamlet as defined in Section 17-27-5. (2)  (a)  There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Small Municipalities and Limited Population Counties Fund," which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be used to make grants to small municipalities and limited population counties or natural gas districts created by law and contained therein to assist in completing projects under this section. (b)  Monies in the fund which are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 538, Laws of 2002, Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 508, Laws of 2003, Sections 55 through 70 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2004 Third Extraordinary Session, Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 482, Laws of 2006, Section 15 of Chapter 580, Laws of 2007, Section 1 of Chapter 503, Laws of 2008, Section 42 of Chapter 557, Laws of 2009, Section 38 of Chapter 533, Laws of 2010, Section 41 of Chapter 480, Laws of 2011, Section 30 of Chapter 569, Laws of 2013, Section 4 of Chapter 530, Laws of 2014, Section 11 of Chapter 472, Laws of 2015, Section 19 of Chapter 511, Laws of 2016, Section 5 of Chapter 452, Laws of 2018, Section 19 of Chapter 454, Laws of 2019, * * *or Section 11 of Chapter 492, Laws of 2020, or Section 5 of this act, may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the MDA for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the MDA.  An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by the MDA. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued.  Reimbursements under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements. (3)  The MDA shall establish a grant program to make grants to small municipalities and limited population counties from the Small Municipalities and Limited Population Counties Fund. Grants made under this section to a small municipality or a limited population county shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) during any grant period established by the MDA.  A small municipality or limited population county may apply to the MDA for a grant under this section in the manner provided for in this section. (4)  A small municipality or limited population county desiring assistance under this section must submit an application to the MDA.  The application must include a description of the project for which assistance is requested, the cost of the project for which assistance is requested, the amount of assistance requested and any other information required by the MDA. (5)  The MDA shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section. (6)  The MDA shall file an annual report with the Governor, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 1 of each year, describing all assistance provided under this section. SECTION 7.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Accreted value" of any bonds means, as of any date of computation, an amount equal to the sum of (i) the stated initial value of such bond, plus (ii) the interest accrued thereon from the issue date to the date of computation at the rate, compounded semiannually, that is necessary to produce the approximate yield to maturity shown for bonds of the same maturity. (b)  "State" means the State of Mississippi. (c)  "Commission" means the State Bond Commission. (2)  (a)  The Mississippi Development Authority, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for the program authorized in Section 57-1-701.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Mississippi Development Authority declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this subsection, the Mississippi Development Authority shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).  No bonds authorized under this section shall be issued after July 1, 2030. (b)  The proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Site Development Grant Fund created pursuant to Section 57-1-701.  Any investment earnings on bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this section shall be payable in the manner provided in this subsection.  Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the commission. (4)  The bonds authorized by this section shall be signed by the chairman of the commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the commission.  The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.  However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi. (5)  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this section have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this section, the commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. (6)  The commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this section, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this section from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.  The commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually. If the bonds are to be sold on sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi,  selected by the commission. The commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. (7)  The bonds issued under the provisions of this section are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged.  If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.  All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this subsection. (8)  Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of this section, the commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the Mississippi Site Development Grant Fund created in Section 57-1-701.  The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the Mississippi Development Authority under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. (9)  The bonds authorized under this section may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this section.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the commission by a majority of its members. (10)  The bonds authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (11)  Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this section or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this section, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this section to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon. (12)  All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. (13)  Bonds issued under the provisions of this section and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. (14)  The proceeds of the bonds issued under this section shall be used solely for the purposes therein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. (15)  The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under this section; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof. (16)  This section shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers therein granted, but this section shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state. SECTION 8.  Section 57-1-701, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-1-701.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Eligible entity" means any (i) county, (ii) municipality or (iii) public or private nonprofit local economic development entity including, but not limited to, local authorities, commissions, or other entities created by local and private legislation or pursuant to Section 19-5-99. (b)  "Optioned property" means industrial property that is subject to a real estate option to purchase contract entered into between an eligible entity and a real estate owner, where such option shall be for a minimum of three (3) years and the option price shall not exceed the appraised fair market value of the real estate. (c)  "Eligible expenditures" means: (i)  Fees for architects, engineers, environmental consultants, attorneys, and such other advisors, consultants and agents that MDA determines are necessary to complete site due diligence associated with site development improvements located on industrial property that is publicly owned or is optioned property; (ii)  Contributions toward site development improvements, as approved by MDA, located on industrial property that is publicly owned; (iii) Contributions toward public infrastructure improvements directly serving industrial property that is publicly owned or is optioned property; and/or (iv)  Contributions toward acquisition of publicly owned real property used for economic development purposes by an eligible entity, where the acquisition price shall not exceed the appraised fair market value of the property. (d)  "MDA" means the Mississippi Development Authority. (e)  "Site development improvements" means site clearing, grading, and environmental mitigation; improvements to drainage systems; easement and right-of-way acquisition; sewer systems; transportation directly affecting the site, including roads, bridges or rail; bulkheads; taxiways and parking ramps; land reclamation; water supply (storage, treatment and distribution); telecommunications systems, including fiber optic; natural gas distribution systems; aesthetic improvements; the dredging of channels and basins; or other improvements as approved by MDA. (2)  (a)  There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Site Development Grant Fund," which shall consist of funds made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used to make grants to assist eligible entities as provided in this section. (b)  Monies in the fund which are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Section 2 of Chapter 390, Laws of 2017, Section 5 of Chapter 412, Laws of 2018, Section 1 of Chapter 421, Laws of 2019, Section 4 of Chapter 492, Laws of 2020, Section 8 of Chapter 480, Laws of 2021, * * *or Section 1 of * * *this act Chapter 503, Laws of 2025, or Section 7 of this act, or provided by the Legislature, may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by MDA for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by MDA.  An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by MDA.  Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued or the monies provided by the Legislature. Reimbursements under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements. (3)  (a)  MDA shall establish a program to make grants to eligible entities to match local or other funds associated with improving the marketability of publicly owned industrial property for industrial economic development purposes and other property improvements as approved by MDA.  An eligible entity may apply to MDA for a grant under this program in the manner provided for in this section.  An eligible entity desiring assistance under this section must provide matching funds in an amount determined by MDA.  Matching funds may be provided in the form of cash and/or in-kind services as determined by MDA. (b)  An eligible entity desiring assistance under this section must submit an application to MDA.  The application must include: (i)  A description of the eligible expenditures for which assistance is requested; (ii)  The amount of assistance requested; (iii)  The amount and type of matching funds to be provided by the eligible entity; and (iv)  Any other information required by MDA. (c)  Upon request by MDA, an eligible entity shall provide MDA with access to all studies, reports, documents and/or plans developed as a result of or related to an eligible entity receiving assistance under this section. (4)  MDA shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section. (5)  MDA shall file an annual report with the Governor, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 1 of each year, describing all assistance provided under this section. SECTION 9.  Section 57-61-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-61-25.  (1)  The seller is authorized to borrow, on the credit of the state upon receipt of a resolution from the Mississippi Development Authority requesting the same, monies not exceeding the aggregate sum of * * *Four Hundred Twenty‑seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($427,500,000.00) Four Hundred Twenty-nine Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($429,500,000.00), not including monies borrowed to refund outstanding bonds, notes or replacement notes, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.  The rate of interest on any such bonds or notes which are not subject to taxation shall not exceed the rates set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, for general obligation bonds. (2)  As evidence of indebtedness authorized in this chapter, general or limited obligation bonds of the state shall be issued, from time to time, to provide monies necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter for such total amounts, in such form, in such denominations payable in such currencies (either domestic or foreign, or both) and subject to such terms and conditions of issue, redemption and maturity, rate of interest and time of payment of interest as the seller directs, except that such bonds shall mature or otherwise be retired in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from date thereof and extending not more than thirty (30) years from date thereof. (3)  All bonds and notes issued under authority of this chapter shall be signed by the chairman of the seller, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the seller shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the seller. (4)  All bonds and notes issued under authority of this chapter may be general or limited obligations of the state, and the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi as to general obligation bonds, or the revenues derived from projects assisted as to limited obligation bonds, are hereby pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds and notes. (5)  Such bonds and notes and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. (6)  The bonds may be issued as coupon bonds or registered as to both principal and interest, as the seller may determine.  If interest coupons are attached, they shall contain the facsimile signature of the chairman and secretary of the seller. (7)  The seller is authorized to provide, by resolution, for the issuance of refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any debt issued under the provisions of this chapter and then outstanding, either by voluntary exchange with the holders of the outstanding debt or to provide funds to redeem and the costs of issuance and retirement of the debt, at maturity or at any call date.  The issuance of the refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof and the duties of the issuing officials in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this section, insofar as they may be applicable. (8)  As to bonds issued hereunder and designated as taxable bonds by the seller, any immunity of the state to taxation by the United States government of interest on bonds or notes issued by the state is hereby waived. (9)  The proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter after April 9, 2002, and any monies provided by the Legislature may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the authority.  An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by the Mississippi Development Authority. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued or the monies provided by the Legislature.  Reimbursements under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements. SECTION 10.  Section 57-61-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-61-36.  (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Fourteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($14,500,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of making grants to municipalities through a Development Infrastructure Grant Fund to complete infrastructure related to new or expanded industry. (2)  [Repealed] (3)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize the monies transferred from the Housing Development Revolving Loan Fund and not more than * * *One Hundred Fourteen Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($114,100,000.00) One Hundred Fifteen Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($115,100,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of making grants or loans to municipalities through an equipment and public facilities grant and loan fund to aid in infrastructure-related improvements as determined by the Mississippi Development Authority, the purchase of equipment and in the purchase, construction or repair and renovation of public facilities.  Any bonds previously issued for the Development Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program which have not been loaned or applied for are eligible to be administered as grants or loans.  In making grants and loans under this section, the Mississippi Development Authority shall attempt to provide for an equitable distribution of such grants and loans among each of the congressional districts of this state in order to promote economic development across the entire state. The requirements of Section 57-61-9 shall not apply to any grant made under this subsection.  The Mississippi Development Authority may establish criteria and guidelines to govern grants made pursuant to this subsection. (4)  [Repealed] (5)  (a)  The Mississippi Development Authority may establish a Capital Access Program and may contract with any financial institution to participate in the program upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall consider necessary and proper.  The Mississippi Development Authority may establish loss reserve accounts at financial institutions that participate in the program and require payments by the financial institution and the borrower to such loss reserve accounts.  All monies in such loss reserve accounts is the property of the Mississippi Development Authority. (b)  Under the Capital Access Program a participating financial institution may make a loan to any borrower the Mississippi Development Authority determines to be qualified under rules and regulations adopted by the authority and be protected against losses from such loans as provided in the program.  Under such rules and regulations as may be adopted by the Mississippi Development Authority, a participating financial institution may submit claims for the reimbursement for losses incurred as a result of default on loans by qualified borrowers. (c)  Under the Capital Access Program a participating financial institution may make a loan that is secured by the assignment of the proceeds of a contract between the borrower and a public entity if the Mississippi Development Authority determines the loan to be qualified under the rules and regulations adopted by the authority. Under such rules and regulations as may be adopted by the Mississippi Development Authority, a participating financial institution may submit an application to the authority requesting that a loan secured pursuant to this paragraph be funded under the Capital Access Program. (d)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority may utilize not more than One Million Five Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($1,550,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of making payments to loan loss reserve accounts established at financial institutions that participate in the Capital Access Program established by the Mississippi Development Authority; however, any portion of the bond proceeds authorized to be utilized by this paragraph that are not utilized for making payments to loss reserve accounts may be utilized by the Mississippi Development Authority to advance funds to financial institutions that participate in the Capital Access Program pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection. (6)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of assisting Warren County, Mississippi, in the continuation and completion of the study for the proposed Kings Point Levee. (7)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of developing a long-range plan for coordinating the resources of the state institutions of higher learning, the community and junior colleges, the Mississippi Development Authority and other state agencies in order to promote economic development in the state. (8)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall use not more than One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of providing assistance to municipalities that have received Community Development Block Grant funds for repair, renovation and other improvements to buildings for use as community centers.  Assistance provided to a municipality under this subsection shall be used by the municipality to match such Community Development Block Grant funds.  The maximum amount of assistance that may be provided to a municipality under this subsection shall not exceed Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) in the aggregate. (9)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of assisting in paying the costs of constructing a new spillway and related bridge and dam structures at Lake Mary in Wilkinson County, Mississippi, including construction of a temporary dam and diversion canal, removing existing structures, removing and stockpiling riprap, spillway construction, dam embankment construction, road access, constructing bridges and related structures, design and construction engineering and field testing. (10)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of assisting the City of Holly Springs, Mississippi, in providing water and sewer and other infrastructure services in the Marshall, Benton and Tippah Counties area. SECTION 11.  Section 57-61-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-61-41.  (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than * * *Thirty‑two Million Dollars ($32,000,000.00) Thirty-three Million Dollars ($33,000,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter to be made available to counties, municipalities, or state, county or municipal port and airport authorities through a Port, Airport and Rail Revitalization Revolving Loan Fund for the purpose of making loans to port and airport authorities for the improvement of port and airport facilities, or making loans to counties or municipalities for publicly owned freight rail service projects, to promote commerce and economic growth.  Proceeds shall not be made available to provide any facilities for utilization by a gaming vessel. (2)  In exercising its authority, the Mississippi Development Authority shall establish criteria and guidelines to govern loans made pursuant to this section. SECTION 12.  Section 57-75-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-75-15.  (1)  Upon notification to the authority by the enterprise that the state has been finally selected as the site for the project, the State Bond Commission shall have the power and is hereby authorized and directed, upon receipt of a declaration from the authority as hereinafter provided, to borrow money and issue general obligation bonds of the state in one or more series for the purposes herein set out.  Upon such notification, the authority may thereafter, from time to time, declare the necessity for the issuance of general obligation bonds as authorized by this section and forward such declaration to the State Bond Commission, provided that before such notification, the authority may enter into agreements with the United States government, private companies and others that will commit the authority to direct the State Bond Commission to issue bonds for eligible undertakings set out in subsection (4) of this section, conditioned on the siting of the project in the state. (2)  Upon receipt of any such declaration from the authority, the State Bond Commission shall verify that the state has been selected as the site of the project and shall act as the issuing agent for the series of bonds directed to be issued in such declaration pursuant to authority granted in this section. (3)  (a)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(i) shall not exceed an aggregate principal amount in the sum of Sixty-seven Million Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($67,350,000.00). (b)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii) shall not exceed * * *Eighty‑seven Million Dollars ($87,000,000.00) Eighty-eight Million Dollars ($88,000,000.00).  The authority, with the express direction of the State Bond Commission, is authorized to expend any remaining proceeds of bonds issued under the authority of this act prior to January 1, 1998, for the purpose of financing projects as then defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii) or for any other projects as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii), as it may be amended from time to time.  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph (b) until the State Bond Commission by resolution adopts a finding that the issuance of such bonds will improve, expand or otherwise enhance the military installation, its support areas or military operations, or will provide employment opportunities to replace those lost by closure or reductions in operations at the military installation or will support critical studies or investigations authorized by Section 57-75-5(f)(ii). (c)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iii) shall not exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after December 31, 1996. (d)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) shall not exceed Three Hundred Fifty-one Million Dollars ($351,000,000.00).  An additional amount of bonds in an amount not to exceed Twelve Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($12,500,000.00) may be issued under the authority of this section for the purpose of defraying costs associated with the construction of surface water transmission lines for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) or for any facility related to the project.  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2005. (e)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(v) and for facilities related to such projects shall not exceed Thirty-eight Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($38,500,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after April 1, 2005. (f)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(vii) shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2006. (g)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(viii) shall not exceed Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2008. (h)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ix) shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2007. (i)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(x) shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after April 1, 2005. (j)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xii) shall not exceed Thirty-three Million Dollars ($33,000,000.00).  The amount of bonds that may be issued under this paragraph for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xii) may be reduced by the amount of any federal or local funds made available for such projects.  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph until local governments in or near the county in which the project is located have irrevocably committed funds to the project in an amount of not less than Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) in the aggregate; however, this irrevocable commitment requirement may be waived by the authority upon a finding that due to the unforeseen circumstances created by Hurricane Katrina, the local governments are unable to comply with such commitment.  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2008. (k)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiii) shall not exceed Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2009. (l)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv) shall not exceed Twenty-four Million Dollars ($24,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph until local governments in the county in which the project is located have irrevocably committed funds to the project in an amount of not less than Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2009. (m)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xv) shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2009. (n)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xvi) shall not exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2011. (o)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xvii) shall not exceed Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2010. (p)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) shall not exceed Ninety-six Million Dollars ($96,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2011. (q)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xix) shall not exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2012. (r)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) shall not exceed Twenty-three Million Dollars ($23,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after April 25, 2013. (s)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) shall not exceed Two Hundred Ninety-three Million Nine Hundred Thousand Dollars ($293,900,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2020. (t)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for Tier One suppliers shall not exceed Thirty Million Dollars ($30,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2020. (u)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) shall not exceed Forty-eight Million Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($48,400,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2020. (v)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii) shall not exceed Eighty-eight Million Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($88,250,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2009. (w)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv) shall not exceed Thirteen Million Dollars ($13,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2020. (x)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxv) shall not exceed Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2017. (y)  [Deleted] (z)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvii) shall not exceed Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after April 25, 2013. (aa)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) shall not exceed Seventy Million Dollars ($70,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2026. (bb)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) shall not exceed Two Hundred Sixty-three Million Dollars ($263,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2034. (cc)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx) shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00).  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2025. (dd)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi) shall not exceed Two Hundred Forty-six Million Seven Hundred Ninety-eight Thousand Five Hundred Fifty Dollars ($246,798,550.00); however, the total amount of bonds that may be issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi) shall be reduced by the amount of any other funds authorized by the Legislature during the 2022 First Extraordinary Session specifically for such projects.  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2040. (ee)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) shall not exceed Four Hundred Eighty-two Million Dollars ($482,000,000.00); however, the total amount of bonds that may be issued under the authority of this section for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) shall be reduced by the amount of any other funds authorized by the Legislature specifically for such project.  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2040. (ff)  Bonds issued under the authority of this section for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) shall not exceed Two Hundred Sixty Million Dollars ($260,000,000.00); however, the total amount of bonds that may be issued under the authority of this section for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) shall be reduced by the amount of any other funds authorized by the Legislature specifically for such project.  No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2040. (4)  (a)  The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued under this section may be applied for the following purposes: (i)  Defraying all or any designated portion of the costs incurred with respect to acquisition, planning, design, construction, installation, rehabilitation, improvement, relocation and with respect to state-owned property, operation and maintenance of the project and any facility related to the project located within the project area, including costs of design and engineering, all costs incurred to provide land, easements and rights-of-way, relocation costs with respect to the project and with respect to any facility related to the project located within the project area, and costs associated with mitigation of environmental impacts and environmental impact studies; (ii)  Defraying the cost of providing for the recruitment, screening, selection, training or retraining of employees, candidates for employment or replacement employees of the project and any related activity; (iii)  Reimbursing the Mississippi Development Authority for expenses it incurred in regard to projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) prior to November 6, 2000.  The Mississippi Development Authority shall submit an itemized list of expenses it incurred in regard to such projects to the Chairmen of the Finance and Appropriations Committees of the Senate and the Chairmen of the Ways and Means and Appropriations Committees of the House of Representatives; (iv)  Providing grants to enterprises operating projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1; (v)  Paying any warranty made by the authority regarding site work for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1; (vi)  Defraying the cost of marketing and promotion of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii).  The authority shall submit an itemized list of costs incurred for marketing and promotion of such project to the Chairmen of the Finance and Appropriations Committees of the Senate and the Chairmen of the Ways and Means and Appropriations Committees of the House of Representatives; (vii)  Providing for the payment of interest on the bonds; (viii)  Providing debt service reserves; (ix)  Paying underwriters' discount, original issue discount, accountants' fees, engineers' fees, attorneys' fees, rating agency fees and other fees and expenses in connection with the issuance of the bonds; (x)  For purposes authorized in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (4); (xi)  Providing grants to enterprises operating projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(v), or, in connection with a facility related to such a project, for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate; (xii)  Providing grant funds or loans to a public agency or an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii); (xiii)  Providing grant funds or loans to an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv); (xiv)  Providing grants, loans and payments to or for the benefit of an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii); (xv)  Purchasing equipment for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(viii) subject to such terms and conditions as the authority considers necessary and appropriate; (xvi)  Providing grant funds to an enterprise developing or owning a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx); (xvii)  Providing grants and loans for projects as authorized in Section 57-75-11(kk), (ll), (mm), (uu), (vv) or, in connection with a facility related to such a project, for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate; (xviii)  Providing grants for projects as authorized in Section 57-75-11(pp) for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate; (xix)  Providing grants and loans for projects as authorized in Section 57-75-11(qq); (xx)  Providing grants for projects as authorized in Section 57-75-11(rr); (xxi)  Providing grants, loans and payments as authorized in Section 57-75-11(ss); (xxii)  Providing grants and loans as authorized in Section 57-75-11(tt); (xxiii)  Providing grants as authorized in Section 57-75-11(ww) for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate; and (xxiv)  Providing loans, grants and other funds as authorized in Section 57-75-11(xx), (yy), (zz) and (aaa) for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate. Such bonds shall be issued, from time to time, and in such principal amounts as shall be designated by the authority, not to exceed in aggregate principal amounts the amount authorized in subsection (3) of this section.  Proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued under this section may be invested, subject to federal limitations, pending their use, in such securities as may be specified in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture securing them, and the earning on such investment applied as provided in such resolution or trust indenture. (b)  (i)  The proceeds of bonds issued after June 21, 2002, under this section for projects described in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority in providing assistance related to a project for which funding is provided from the use of proceeds of such bonds.  The Mississippi Development Authority shall maintain an accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought.  Reimbursements under this paragraph (b)(i) shall not exceed Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) in the aggregate.  Reimbursements under this paragraph (b)(i) shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements. (ii)  The proceeds of bonds issued after June 21, 2002, under this section for projects described in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Audit in providing services related to a project for which funding is provided from the use of proceeds of such bonds.  The Department of Audit shall maintain an accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought.  The Department of Audit may escalate its budget and expend such funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.  Reimbursements under this paragraph (b)(ii) shall not exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) in the aggregate.  Reimbursements under this paragraph (b)(ii) shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements. (c)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the proceeds of bonds issued under this section for a project described in Section 57-75-5(f) may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority in providing assistance related to the project for which funding is provided for the use of proceeds of such bonds.  The Mississippi Development Authority shall maintain an accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought.  Reimbursements under this paragraph shall not exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each project. (ii)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the proceeds of bonds issued under this section for a project described in Section 57-75-5(f) may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Audit in providing services related to the project for which funding is provided from the use of proceeds of such bonds.  The Department of Audit shall maintain an accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought.  The Department of Audit may escalate its budget and expend such funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. Reimbursements under this paragraph shall not exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each project.  Reimbursements under this paragraph shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements. (5)  The principal of and the interest on the bonds shall be payable in the manner hereinafter set forth.  The bonds shall bear date or dates; be in such denomination or denominations; bear interest at such rate or rates; be payable at such place or places within or without the state; mature absolutely at such time or times; be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium; bear such registration privileges; and be substantially in such form; all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission except that such bonds shall mature or otherwise be retired in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from the date thereof and extending not more than twenty-five (25) years from the date thereof.  The bonds shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be imprinted on or affixed thereto, attested by the manual or facsimile signature of the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. Whenever any such bonds have been signed by the officials herein designated to sign the bonds, who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. (6)  All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code and in exercising the powers granted by this chapter, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. (7)  The State Bond Commission shall act as issuing agent for the bonds, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of the bonds.  The State Bond Commission may sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  The bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101 as shall be fixed by the State Bond Commission.  All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually. If the bonds are to be sold on sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale of any bonds shall be published at least one time, the first of which shall be made not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, selected by the State Bond Commission. The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that the bonds, at the option of the state, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. (8)  State bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be the general obligations of the state and backed by the full faith and credit of the state.  The Legislature shall appropriate annually an amount sufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due.  All bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the foregoing provisions of this section. (9)  The State Treasurer is authorized to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants payable out of any funds appropriated by the Legislature under this section for such purpose, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of and interest on all bonds issued under the provisions of this section.  The State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof. (10)  The bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this chapter.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of general obligation bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members. (11)  In anticipation of the issuance of bonds hereunder, the State Bond Commission is authorized to negotiate and enter into any purchase, loan, credit or other agreement with any bank, trust company or other lending institution or to issue and sell interim notes for the purpose of making any payments authorized under this section. All borrowings made under this provision shall be evidenced by notes of the state which shall be issued from time to time, for such amounts not exceeding the amount of bonds authorized herein, in such form and in such denomination and subject to such terms and conditions of sale and issuance, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest not to exceed the maximum rate authorized herein for bonds, and time of payment of interest as the State Bond Commission shall agree to in such agreement.  Such notes shall constitute general obligations of the state and shall be backed by the full faith and credit of the state.  Such notes may also be issued for the purpose of refunding previously issued notes.  No note shall mature more than three (3) years following the date of its issuance.  The State Bond Commission is authorized to provide for the compensation of any purchaser of the notes by payment of a fixed fee or commission and for all other costs and expenses of issuance and service, including paying agent costs.  Such costs and expenses may be paid from the proceeds of the notes. (12)  The bonds and interim notes authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The necessary papers for such validation proceedings shall be transmitted to the State Bond Attorney, and the required notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (13)  Any bonds or interim notes issued under the provisions of this chapter, a transaction relating to the sale or securing of such bonds or interim notes, their transfer and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state, excepting inheritance and gift taxes. (14)  All bonds issued under this chapter shall be legal investments for trustees, other fiduciaries, savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities and other political subdivisions thereof for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. (15)  The Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the State Bond Commission in issuing, selling and validating bonds herein provided for, and the Bond Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to expend from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds authorized hereunder all necessary administrative, legal and other expenses incidental and related to the issuance of bonds authorized under this chapter. (16)  There is hereby created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Fund wherein shall be deposited the proceeds of the bonds issued under this chapter and all monies received by the authority to carry out the purposes of this chapter.  Expenditures authorized herein shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants drawn from the fund, and the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue warrants upon requisitions signed by the director of the authority. (17)  (a)  There is hereby created the Mississippi Economic Impact Authority Sinking Fund from which the principal of and interest on such bonds shall be paid by appropriation.  All monies paid into the sinking fund not appropriated to pay accruing bonds and interest shall be invested by the State Treasurer in such securities as are provided by law for the investment of the sinking funds of the state. (b)  In the event that all or any part of the bonds and notes are purchased, they shall be cancelled and returned to the loan and transfer agent as cancelled and paid bonds and notes and thereafter all payments of interest thereon shall cease and the cancelled bonds, notes and coupons, together with any other cancelled bonds, notes and coupons, shall be destroyed as promptly as possible after cancellation but not later than two (2) years after cancellation.  A certificate evidencing the destruction of the cancelled bonds, notes and coupons shall be provided by the loan and transfer agent to the seller. (c)  The State Treasurer shall determine and report to the Department of Finance and Administration and Legislative Budget Office by September 1 of each year the amount of money necessary for the payment of the principal of and interest on outstanding obligations for the following fiscal year and the times and amounts of the payments.  It shall be the duty of the Governor to include in every executive budget submitted to the Legislature full information relating to the issuance of bonds and notes under the provisions of this chapter and the status of the sinking fund for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds and notes. (d)  Any monies repaid to the state from loans authorized in Section 57-75-11(hh) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Sinking Fund unless the State Bond Commission, at the request of the authority, shall determine that such loan repayments are needed to provide additional loans as authorized under Section 57-75-11(hh).  For purposes of providing additional loans, there is hereby created the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Revolving Loan Fund and loan repayments shall be deposited into the fund.  The fund shall be maintained for such period as determined by the State Bond Commission for the sole purpose of making additional loans as authorized by Section 57-75-11(hh). Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund and any interest earned on amounts in such fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (e)  Any monies repaid to the state from loans authorized in Section 57-75-11(ii) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Sinking Fund. (f)  Any monies repaid to the state from loans, grants and other funds authorized in Section 57-75-11(jj), (vv), (xx), (zz) and (aaa) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Sinking Fund.  However: (i)  Monies paid to the state from a county in which a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) is located and which is paid pursuant to any agreement under Section 57-75-37(6)(c)(iii) shall, after being received from the county and properly accounted for, be deposited into the State General Fund; and (ii)  Monies paid to the state from a county and/or municipality in which a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) is located and which is paid pursuant to any agreement under Section 57-75-37(7)(c)(iii) shall, after being received from the county and/or municipality and properly accounted for, be deposited into the State General Fund. (18)  (a)  Upon receipt of a declaration by the authority that it has determined that the state is a potential site for a project, the State Bond Commission is authorized and directed to authorize the State Treasurer to borrow money from any special fund in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated to be utilized by the authority for the purposes provided for in this subsection. (b)  The proceeds of the money borrowed under this subsection may be utilized by the authority for the purpose of defraying all or a portion of the costs incurred by the authority with respect to acquisition options and planning, design and environmental impact studies with respect to a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix).  The authority may escalate its budget and expend the proceeds of the money borrowed under this subsection in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. (c)  The authority shall request an appropriation or additional authority to issue general obligation bonds to repay the borrowed funds and establish a date for the repayment of the funds so borrowed. (d)  Borrowings made under the provisions of this subsection shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) at any one time. SECTION 13.  Section 25, Chapter 533, Laws of 2010, as amended by Section 4, Chapter 30, Laws of 2010 Second Extraordinary Session, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 301, Laws of 2011, as amended by Section 6, Chapter 480, Laws of 2011, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 1, Laws of 2011 First Extraordinary Session, as amended by Section 8, Chapter 421, Laws of 2019, as amended by Section 14, Chapter 480, Laws of 2021, as amended by Section 7, Chapter 507, Laws of 2024, as amended by Section 8, Chapter 503, Laws of 2025, is amended as follows: Section 25.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Accreted value" of any bonds means, as of any date of computation, an amount equal to the sum of (i) the stated initial value of such bond, plus (ii) the interest accrued thereon from the issue date to the date of computation at the rate, compounded semiannually, that is necessary to produce the approximate yield to maturity shown for bonds of the same maturity. (b)  "State" means the State of Mississippi. (c)  "Commission" means the State Bond Commission. (2)  (a)  The Mississippi Development Authority, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for the program authorized in Section 57-1-221.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Mississippi Development Authority, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this subsection, the Mississippi Development Authority shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed * * * Five Hundred Fourteen Million Dollars ($514,000,000.00) Five Hundred Thirty-five Million Dollars ($535,000,000.00).  No bonds authorized under this section shall be issued after July 1, 2029. (b)  The proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Industry Incentive Financing Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 57-1-221. Any investment earnings on bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this section shall be payable in the manner provided in this subsection.  Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the commission. (4)  The bonds authorized by this section shall be signed by the chairman of the commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the commission.  The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.  However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi. (5)  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this section have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this section, the commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. (6)  The commission shall act as issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this section, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this section from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.  The commission may sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually. If such bonds are sold by sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, selected by the commission. The commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. (7)  The bonds issued under the provisions of this section are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged.  If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.  All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this subsection. (8)  Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of this section, the commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the Mississippi Industry Incentive Financing Revolving Fund created in Section 57-1-221.  The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the Mississippi Development Authority under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. (9)  The bonds authorized under this section may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this section.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the commission by a majority of its members. (10)  The bonds authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (11)  Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this section or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this section, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this section to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon. (12)  All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. (13)  Bonds issued under the provisions of this section and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. (14)  The proceeds of the bonds issued under this section shall be used solely for the purposes therein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. (15)  The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under this section; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof. (16)  This section shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers therein granted, but this section shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state. SECTION 14.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Accreted value" of any bonds means, as of any date of computation, an amount equal to the sum of (i) the stated initial value of such bond, plus (ii) the interest accrued thereon from the issue date to the date of computation at the rate, compounded semiannually, that is necessary to produce the approximate yield to maturity shown for bonds of the same maturity. (b)  "State" means the State of Mississippi. (c)  "Commission" means the State Bond Commission. (2)  (a)  The Mississippi Development Authority, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for the program authorized in Section 2 of House Bill No. 1393, 2026 Regular Session.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Mississippi Development Authority declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this subsection, the Mississippi Development Authority shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).  No bonds authorized under this section shall be issued after July 1, 2030. (b)  The proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Energy Infrastructure Fund created pursuant to Section 2 of House Bill No. 1393, 2026 Regular Session.  Any investment earnings on bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this section shall be payable in the manner provided in this subsection.  Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the commission. (4)  The bonds authorized by this section shall be signed by the chairman of the commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the commission.  The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.  However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi. (5)  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this section have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this section, the commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. (6)  The commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this section, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this section from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.  The commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually. If the bonds are to be sold on sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi,  selected by the commission. The commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. (7)  The bonds issued under the provisions of this section are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged.  If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.  All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this subsection. (8)  Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of this section, the commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the Mississippi Energy Infrastructure Fund created in Section 2 of House Bill No. 1393, 2026 Regular Session.  The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the Mississippi Development Authority under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. (9)  The bonds authorized under this section may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this section.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the commission by a majority of its members. (10)  The bonds authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (11)  Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this section or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this section, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this section to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon. (12)  All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. (13)  Bonds issued under the provisions of this section and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. (14)  The proceeds of the bonds issued under this section shall be used solely for the purposes therein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. (15)  The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under this section; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof. (16)  This section shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers therein granted, but this section shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state. SECTION 15.  Section 27-7-22.41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-7-22.41.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Department" means the Department of Revenue. (b)  "Eligible charitable organization" means an organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is: (i)  Licensed by or under contract with the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services and provides services for: 1.  The prevention and diversion of children from custody with the Department of Child Protection Services, 2.  The safety, care and well-being of children in custody with the Department of Child Protection Services, or 3.  The express purpose of creating permanency for children through adoption; or (ii)  Certified by the department as an educational services charitable organization that is accredited by a regional accrediting organization and provides services to: 1.  Children in a foster care placement program established by the Department of Child Protection Services, children placed under the Safe Families for Children model, or children at significant risk of entering a foster care placement program established by the Department of Child Protection Services, 2.  Children who have a chronic illness or physical, intellectual, developmental or emotional disability, or 3.  Children eligible for free or reduced price meals programs under Section 37-11-7, or selected for participation in the Promise Neighborhoods Program sponsored by the U.S. Department of Education. (2)  (a)  The tax credit authorized in this section shall be available only to a taxpayer who is a business enterprise engaged in commercial, industrial or professional activities and operating as a corporation, limited liability company, partnership or sole proprietorship.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a credit is allowed against the taxes imposed by Sections 27-7-5, 27-15-103, 27-15-109 and 27-15-123, for voluntary cash contributions made by a taxpayer during the taxable year to an eligible charitable organization.  From and after January 1, 2022, for a taxpayer that is not operating as a corporation, a credit is also allowed against ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property for voluntary cash contributions made by the taxpayer during the taxable year to an eligible charitable organization.  The amount of credit that may be utilized by a taxpayer in a taxable year shall be limited to (i) an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total tax liability of the taxpayer for the taxes imposed by such sections of law and (ii) an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total tax liability of the taxpayer for ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property.  Any tax credit claimed under this section but not used in any taxable year may be carried forward for five (5) consecutive years from the close of the tax year in which the credits were earned. (b)  A contribution to an eligible charitable organization for which a credit is claimed under this section does not qualify for and shall not be included in any credit that may be claimed under Section 27-7-22.39. (c)  A contribution for which a credit is claimed under this section may not be used as a deduction by the taxpayer for state income tax purposes. (3)  Taxpayers taking a credit authorized by this section shall provide the name of the eligible charitable organization and the amount of the contribution to the department on forms provided by the department. (4)  An eligible charitable organization shall provide the department with a written certification that it meets all criteria to be considered an eligible charitable organization.  An eligible charitable organization must also provide the department with written documented proof of its license and/or written contract with the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services.  The organization shall also notify the department of any changes that may affect eligibility under this section. (5)  The eligible charitable organization's written certification must be signed by an officer of the organization under penalty of perjury.  The written certification shall include the following: (a)  Verification of the organization's status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (b)  A statement that the organization does not provide, pay for or provide coverage of abortions and does not financially support any other entity that provides, pays for or provides coverage of abortions; (c)  A statement that the funds generated from the tax credit shall be used for educational resources, staff and expenditures and/or other purposes described in this section. (d)  Any other information that the department requires to administer this section. (6)  The department shall review each written certification and determine whether the organization meets all the criteria to be considered an eligible charitable organization and notify the organization of its determination.  The department may also periodically request recertification from the organization.  The department shall compile and make available to the public a list of eligible charitable organizations. (7)  Tax credits authorized by this section that are earned by a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation or other similar pass-through entity, shall be allocated among all partners, members or shareholders, respectively, either in proportion to their ownership interest in such entity or as the partners, members or shareholders mutually agree as provided in an executed document. (8) (a)  A taxpayer shall apply for credits with the department on forms prescribed by the department.  In the application the taxpayer shall certify to the department the dollar amount of the contributions made or to be made during the calendar year.  Within thirty (30) days after the receipt of an application, the department shall allocate credits based on the dollar amount of contributions as certified in the application.  However, if the department cannot allocate the full amount of credits certified in the application due to the limit on the aggregate amount of credits that may be awarded under this section in a calendar year, the department shall so notify the applicant within thirty (30) days with the amount of credits, if any, that may be allocated to the applicant in the calendar year.  Once the department has allocated credits to a taxpayer, if the contribution for which a credit is allocated has not been made as of the date of the allocation, then the contribution must be made not later than sixty (60) days from the date of the allocation.  If the contribution is not made within such time period, the allocation shall be cancelled and returned to the department for reallocation. Upon final documentation of the contributions, if the actual dollar amount of the contributions is lower than the amount estimated, the department shall adjust the tax credit allowed under this section. (b) A taxpayer who applied for a tax credit under this section during calendar year 2020, but who was unable to be awarded the credit due to the limit on the aggregate amount of credits authorized for calendar year 2020, shall be given priority for tax credits authorized to be allocated to taxpayers under this section by Section 27-7-22.39. (c) For the purposes of using a tax credit against ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property, a taxpayer shall present to the appropriate tax collector the tax credit documentation provided to the taxpayer by the Department of Revenue, and the tax collector shall apply the tax credit against such ad valorem taxes.  The tax collector shall forward the tax credit documentation to the Department of Revenue along with the amount of the tax credit applied against ad valorem taxes, and the department shall disburse funds to the tax collector for the amount of the tax credit applied against ad valorem taxes. Such payments by the Department of Revenue shall be made from current tax collections. (9)  The aggregate amount of tax credits that may be allocated by the department under this section during a calendar year shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), and not more than fifty percent (50%) of tax credits allocated during a calendar year may be allocated for contributions to eligible charitable organizations described in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section.  However, for calendar year 2021, the aggregate amount of tax credits that may be allocated by the department under this section during a calendar year shall not exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00), for calendar year 2022, the aggregate amount of tax credits that may be allocated by the department under this section during a calendar year shall not exceed Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00), and for calendar year 2023, and for each calendar year thereafter, the aggregate amount of tax credits that may be allocated by the department under this section during a calendar year shall not exceed Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00).  For calendar year 2021, and for each calendar year thereafter, fifty percent (50%) of the tax credits allocated during a calendar year shall be allocated for contributions to eligible charitable organizations described in subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section and fifty percent (50%) of the tax credits allocated during a calendar year shall be allocated for contributions to eligible charitable organizations described in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section.  For calendar year 2021, and for each calendar year thereafter, for credits allocated during a calendar year for contributions to eligible charitable organizations described in subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section, no more than twenty-five percent (25%) of such credits may be allocated for contributions to a single eligible charitable organization.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, for calendar year 2021, and for each calendar year thereafter, for credits allocated during a calendar year for contributions to eligible charitable organizations described in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section, no more than four and one-half percent (4-1/2%) of such credits may be allocated for contributions to a single eligible charitable organization. SECTION 16.  Section 27-65-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-65-111.  The exemptions from the provisions of this chapter which are not industrial, agricultural or governmental, or which do not relate to utilities or taxes, or which are not properly classified as one (1) of the exemption classifications of this chapter, shall be confined to persons or property exempted by this section or by the Constitution of the United States or the State of Mississippi.  No exemptions as now provided by any other section, except the classified exemption sections of this chapter set forth herein, shall be valid as against the tax herein levied.  Any subsequent exemption from the tax levied hereunder, except as indicated above, shall be provided by amendments to this section. No exemption provided in this section shall apply to taxes levied by Section 27-65-15 or 27-65-21. The tax levied by this chapter shall not apply to the following: (a)  Sales of tangible personal property and services to hospitals or infirmaries owned and operated by a corporation or association in which no part of the net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder, group or individual, and which are subject to and governed by Sections 41-7-123 through 41-7-127. Only sales of tangible personal property or services which are ordinary and necessary to the operation of such hospitals and infirmaries are exempted from tax. (b)  Sales of daily or weekly newspapers, and periodicals or publications of scientific, literary or educational organizations exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as it exists as of March 31, 1975, and subscription sales of all magazines. (c)  Sales of coffins, caskets and other materials used in the preparation of human bodies for burial. (d)  Sales of tangible personal property for immediate export to a foreign country. (e)  Sales of tangible personal property to an orphanage, old men's or ladies' home, supported wholly or in part by a religious denomination, fraternal nonprofit organization or other nonprofit organization. (f)  Sales of tangible personal property, labor or services taxable under Sections 27-65-17, 27-65-19 and 27-65-23, to a YMCA, YWCA, a Boys' or Girls' Club owned and operated by a corporation or association in which no part of the net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder, group or individual. (g)  Sales to elementary and secondary grade schools, junior and senior colleges owned and operated by a corporation or association in which no part of the net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder, group or individual, and which are exempt from state income taxation, provided that this exemption does not apply to sales of property or services which are not to be used in the ordinary operation of the school, or which are to be resold to the students or the public. (h)  The gross proceeds of retail sales and the use or consumption in this state of drugs and medicines: (i)  Prescribed for the treatment of a human being by a person authorized to prescribe the medicines, and dispensed or prescription filled by a registered pharmacist in accordance with law; or (ii)  Furnished by a licensed physician, surgeon, dentist or podiatrist to his own patient for treatment of the patient; or (iii)  Furnished by a hospital for treatment of any person pursuant to the order of a licensed physician, surgeon, dentist or podiatrist; or (iv)  Sold to a licensed physician, surgeon, podiatrist, dentist or hospital for the treatment of a human being; or (v)  Sold to this state or any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, for use in the treatment of a human being or furnished for the treatment of a human being by a medical facility or clinic maintained by this state or any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof. "Medicines," as used in this paragraph (h), shall mean and include any substance or preparation intended for use by external or internal application to the human body in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease and which is commonly recognized as a substance or preparation intended for such use; "medicines" do not include any auditory, prosthetic, ophthalmic or ocular device or appliance, any dentures or parts thereof or any artificial limbs or their replacement parts, articles which are in the nature of splints, bandages, pads, compresses, supports, dressings, instruments, apparatus, contrivances, appliances, devices or other mechanical, electronic, optical or physical equipment or article or the component parts and accessories thereof, or any alcoholic beverage or any other drug or medicine not commonly referred to as a prescription drug. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence of this paragraph (h), "medicines" as used in this paragraph (h), shall mean and include sutures, whether or not permanently implanted, bone screws, bone pins, pacemakers and other articles permanently implanted in the human body to assist the functioning of any natural organ, artery, vein or limb and which remain or dissolve in the body. The exemption provided in this paragraph (h) shall not apply to medical cannabis sold in accordance with the provisions of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder. "Hospital," as used in this paragraph (h), shall have the meaning ascribed to it in Section 41-9-3. Insulin furnished by a registered pharmacist to a person for treatment of diabetes as directed by a physician shall be deemed to be dispensed on prescription within the meaning of this paragraph (h). (i)  Retail sales of automobiles, trucks and truck-tractors if exported from this state within forty-eight (48) hours and registered and first used in another state. (j)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Salvation Army and the Muscular Dystrophy Association, Inc. (k)  From July 1, 1985, through December 31, 1992, retail sales of "alcohol-blended fuel" as such term is defined in Section 75-55-5.  The gasoline-alcohol blend or the straight alcohol eligible for this exemption shall not contain alcohol distilled outside the State of Mississippi. (l)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Institute for Technology Development. (m)  The gross proceeds of retail sales of food and drink for human consumption made through vending machines serviced by full-line vendors from and not connected with other taxable businesses. (n)  The gross proceeds of sales of motor fuel. (o)  Retail sales of food for human consumption purchased with food stamps issued by the United States Department of Agriculture, or other federal agency, from and after October 1, 1987, or from and after the expiration of any waiver granted pursuant to federal law, the effect of which waiver is to permit the collection by the state of tax on such retail sales of food for human consumption purchased with food stamps. (p)  Sales of cookies for human consumption by the Girl Scouts of America if no part of the net earnings from those sales inures to the benefit of any private group or individual. (q)  Gifts or sales of tangible personal property or services to public or private nonprofit museums of art. (r)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to alumni associations of state-supported colleges or universities. (s)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to National Association of Junior Auxiliaries, Inc., and chapters of the National Association of Junior Auxiliaries, Inc. (t)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to domestic violence shelters which qualify for state funding under Sections 93-21-101 through 93-21-113. (u)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the National Multiple Sclerosis Society, Mississippi Chapter. (v)  Retail sales of food for human consumption purchased with food instruments issued the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians under the Women, Infants and Children Program (WIC) funded by the United States Department of Agriculture. (w)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to a private company, as defined in Section 57-61-5, which is making such purchases with proceeds of bonds issued under Section 57-61-1 et seq., the Mississippi Business Investment Act. (x)  The gross collections from the operation of self-service, coin-operated car washing equipment and sales of the service of washing motor vehicles with portable high-pressure washing equipment on the premises of the customer. (y)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Mississippi Technology Alliance. (z)  Sales of tangible personal property to nonprofit organizations that provide foster care, adoption services and temporary housing for unwed mothers and their children if the organization is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. (aa)  Sales of tangible personal property to nonprofit organizations that provide residential rehabilitation for persons with alcohol and drug dependencies if the organization is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. (ab)  (i)  Retail sales of an article of clothing or footwear designed to be worn on or about the human body and retail sales of school supplies if the sales price of the article of clothing or footwear or school supply is less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and the sale takes place during a period beginning at 12:01 a.m. on the second Friday in July and ending at 12:00 midnight the following Sunday. This paragraph (ab) shall not apply to: 1. Accessories including jewelry, handbags, luggage, umbrellas, wallets, watches, briefcases, garment bags and similar items carried on or about the human body, without regard to whether worn on the body in a manner characteristic of clothing; 2.  The rental of clothing or footwear; and 3.  Skis, swim fins, roller blades, skates and similar items worn on the foot. (ii)  For purposes of this paragraph (ab), "school supplies" means items that are commonly used by a student in a course of study.  The following is an all-inclusive list: 1.  Backpacks; 2.  Binder pockets; 3.  Binders; 4.  Blackboard chalk; 5.  Book bags; 6. Calculators; 7.  Cellophane tape; 8.  Clays and glazes; 9.  Compasses; 10. Composition books; 11.  Crayons; 12. Dictionaries and thesauruses; 13.  Dividers; 14.  Erasers; 15.  Folders: expandable, pocket, plastic and manila; 16.  Glue, paste and paste sticks; 17. Highlighters; 18.  Index card boxes; 19.  Index cards; 20.  Legal pads; 21.  Lunch boxes; 22.  Markers; 23. Notebooks; 24. Paintbrushes for artwork; 25.  Paints: acrylic, tempera and oil; 26.  Paper: loose-leaf ruled notebook paper, copy paper, graph paper, tracing paper, manila paper, colored paper, poster board and construction paper; 27.  Pencil boxes and other school supply boxes; 28.  Pencil sharpeners; 29.  Pencils; 30.  Pens; 31. Protractors; 32.  Reference books; 33.  Reference maps and globes; 34.  Rulers; 35.  Scissors; 36.  Sheet music; 37.  Sketch and drawing pads; 38. Textbooks; 39. Watercolors; 40. Workbooks; and 41.  Writing tablets. (iii)  From and after January 1, 2010, the governing authorities of a municipality, for retail sales occurring within the corporate limits of the municipality, may suspend the application of the exemption provided for in this paragraph (ab) by adoption of a resolution to that effect stating the date upon which the suspension shall take effect.  A certified copy of the resolution shall be furnished to the Department of Revenue at least ninety (90) days prior to the date upon which the municipality desires such suspension to take effect. (ac)  The gross proceeds of sales of tangible personal property made for the sole purpose of raising funds for a school or an organization affiliated with a school. As used in this paragraph (ac), "school" means any public or private school that teaches courses of instruction to students in any grade from kindergarten through Grade 12. (ad)  Sales of durable medical equipment and home medical supplies when ordered or prescribed by a licensed physician for medical purposes of a patient.  As used in this paragraph (ad), "durable medical equipment" and "home medical supplies" mean equipment, including repair and replacement parts for the equipment or supplies listed under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act or under the state plan for medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, prosthetics, orthotics, hearing aids, hearing devices, prescription eyeglasses, oxygen and oxygen equipment.  Payment does not have to be made, in whole or in part, by any particular person to be eligible for this exemption.  Purchases of home medical equipment and supplies by a provider of home health services or a provider of hospice services are eligible for this exemption if the purchases otherwise meet the requirements of this paragraph. (ae)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to Mississippi Blood Services. (af)  (i)  Subject to the provisions of this paragraph (af), retail sales of firearms, ammunition and hunting supplies if sold during the annual Mississippi Second Amendment Weekend holiday beginning at 12:01 a.m. on the last Friday in August and ending at 12:00 midnight the following Sunday.  For the purposes of this paragraph (af), "hunting supplies" means tangible personal property used for hunting, including, and limited to, archery equipment, firearm and archery cases, firearm and archery accessories, hearing protection, holsters, belts and slings.  Hunting supplies does not include animals used for hunting. (ii)  This paragraph (af) shall apply only if one or more of the following occur: 1.  Title to and/or possession of an eligible item is transferred from a seller to a purchaser; and/or 2.  A purchaser orders and pays for an eligible item and the seller accepts the order for immediate shipment, even if delivery is made after the time period provided in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (af), provided that the purchaser has not requested or caused the delay in shipment. (ag)  Sales of nonperishable food items to charitable organizations that are exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and operate a food bank or food pantry or food lines. (ah)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the United Way of the Pine Belt Region, Inc. (ai)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Mississippi Children's Museum or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof operating a satellite or branch museum within this state. (aj)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Jackson Zoological Park. (ak)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Hattiesburg Zoo. (al)  Gross proceeds from sales of food, merchandise or other concessions at an event held solely for religious or charitable purposes at livestock facilities, agriculture facilities or other facilities constructed, renovated or expanded with funds for the grant program authorized under Section 18, Chapter 530, Laws of 1995. (am)  Sales of tangible personal property and services to the Diabetes Foundation of Mississippi and the Mississippi Chapter of the Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation. (an)  Sales of potting soil, mulch, or other soil amendments used in growing ornamental plants which bear no fruit of commercial value when sold to commercial plant nurseries that operate exclusively at wholesale and where no retail sales can be made. (ao)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the University of Mississippi Medical Center Research Development Foundation. (ap)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to Keep Mississippi Beautiful, Inc., and all affiliates of Keep Mississippi Beautiful, Inc. (aq)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Friends of Children's Hospital. (ar)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Pinecrest Weekend Snackpacks for Kids located in Corinth, Mississippi. (as)  Sales of hearing aids when ordered or prescribed by a licensed physician, audiologist or hearing aid specialist for the medical purposes of a patient. (at)  Sales exempt under the Facilitating Business Rapid Response to State Declared Disasters Act of 2015 (Sections 27-113-1 through 27-113-9). (au) Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Junior League of Jackson. (av)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to the Mississippi's Toughest Kids Foundation for use in the construction, furnishing and equipping of buildings and related facilities and infrastructure at Camp Kamassa in Copiah County, Mississippi. This paragraph (av) shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028. (aw)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to MS Gulf Coast Buddy Sports, Inc. (ax)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to Biloxi Lions, Inc. (ay)  Sales of tangible personal property or services to Lions Sight Foundation of Mississippi, Inc. (az)  Sales of tangible personal property and services to the Goldring/Woldenberg Institute of Southern Jewish Life (ISJL). (ba)  Sales of coins, currency, and bullion.  For the purposes of this paragraph (ba), the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this paragraph (ba) unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (i)  "Bullion" means a bar, ingot, or coin: 1. Manufactured, in whole or in part, of gold, silver, platinum, or palladium; 2.  That was or is used solely as a medium of exchange, security, or commodity by any state, the United States Government, or a foreign nation; and 3.  Sold based on the intrinsic value of the bar, ingot, or coin as a precious metal or collectible item rather than its form or representative value as a medium of exchange. (ii)  "Coin or currency" means a coin or currency: 1. Manufactured, in whole or in part, of gold, silver, other metal, or paper; 2.  That was or is used solely as a medium of exchange, security, or commodity by any state, the United States Government, or a foreign nation; and 3.  Sold based on the intrinsic value of the coin or currency as a precious metal or collectible item rather than its form or representative value as a medium of exchange. "Coin or currency" does not include a coin or currency that has been incorporated into jewelry. SECTION 17.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.